Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1

Liability of Parent or Guardian for Acts of Juveniles

37-10-101. Recovery for injury or damage by juvenile.

Any municipal corporation, county, town, village, school district or department of this state, or any person, or any religious organization, whether incorporated or unincorporated, shall be entitled to recover damages in an action in assumpsit in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in a court of competent jurisdiction from the parents or guardian of the person of any minor under eighteen (18) years of age, living with the parents or guardian of the person, who maliciously or willfully causes personal injury to such person or destroys property, real, personal or mixed, belonging to such municipal corporation, county, town, village, school district or department of this state or persons or religious organizations.

Acts 1957, ch. 76, § 1; 1969, ch. 170, § 1; 1976, ch. 408, § 1; 1981, ch. 161, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1001; Acts 1985, ch. 439, § 1.

Cross-References. Liability for acts of delinquent child, §37-1-131.

Support of child over 18 in high school, §34-1-102.

Law Reviews.

Negligence — Parent's Failure to Prevent Tort by Child, 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 553 (1964).

Tort Liability for Intentional Acts of Family Members: Will Your Insurer Stand by You?, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2000).

Attorney General Opinions. There is no authority to hold a parent or guardian civilly liable for a minor child's conversion of the property of another unless such action is based on the willful or malicious destruction of such property and the parent knew or should have known of the child's tendency to commit wrongful acts and the parent had the opportunity to control the child but failed to exercise reasonable means to restrain the tortious conduct, OAG 01-010 (1/25/01).

The statute confers liability only upon a guardian or parent of a child, not upon an agency that has the child only by virtue of a contract with the state, OAG 02-086 (8/6/02).

37-10-102. Limitation on amount of recovery.

The recovery shall be limited to the actual damages in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), in addition to taxable court costs.

Acts 1957, ch. 76, § 2; 1969, ch. 170, § 2; 1976, ch. 408, § 2; 1981, ch. 161, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-1002.

37-10-103. Circumstances under which parent or guardian liable.

A parent or guardian shall be liable for the tortious activities of a minor child that cause injuries to persons or property where the parent or guardian knows, or should know, of the child's tendency to commit wrongful acts that can be expected to cause injury to persons or property and where the parent or guardian has an opportunity to control the child but fails to exercise reasonable means to restrain the tortious conduct.

A parent or guardian shall be presumed to know of a child's tendency to commit wrongful acts, if the child has previously been charged and found responsible for such actions.

Acts 1957, ch. 76, § 3; 1981, ch. 161, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-1003; Acts 1985, ch. 439, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Criminal liability of parents for acts of children, OAG 98-019 (1/15/98).

There is no authority to hold a parent or guardian civilly liable for a minor child's conversion of the property of another unless such action is based on the willful or malicious destruction of such property and the parent knew or should have known of the child's tendency to commit wrongful acts and the parent had the opportunity to control the child but failed to exercise reasonable means to restrain the tortious conduct, OAG 01-010 (1/25/01).